Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-523
Government Technology Collaboration Fund; created; use; investment.

The Government Technology Collaboration Fund is created. The fund shall be granted by the commission. The fund shall be used to provide incentives for collaborative technology projects and programs by state agencies, boards, and commissions and to assist in meeting the technology needs of small agencies as determined by the commission. The fund shall be administered by the office of Chief Information Officer. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1513;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 293;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 18;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 64.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.